New York, session 2025-2026, A10512.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new article 2 25-C to read as follows: 3 ARTICLE 25-C 4 RIGHT TO DIGNIFIED CARE ACT 5 Section 2599-ff. Legislative intent. 6 2599-gg. Definition. 7 2599-hh. Prohibited intake questions. 8 2599-ii. Enforcement. 9 § 2599-ff. Legislative intent. The legislature finds that unregulated 10 pregnancy centers also known as crisis pregnancy centers, are facilities 11 that represent themselves as offering comprehensive reproductive health 12 care information and services but are primarily intended to discourage 13 clients from seeking or accessing abortions. Unregulated pregnancy 14 centers commonly ask clients to fill out intake forms that resemble 15 those required by licensed health care providers, including questions 16 about prescription history, sexual history, and other personal medical 17 and lifestyle information. However, clients may not understand that such 18 detailed and personal information is not required given the non-medical 19 nature of services provided by unregulated pregnancy centers, nor is 20 such information protected by rules like the health insurance portabil- 21 ity and accountability act or other state and federal laws applicable to 22 regulated health care providers. In practice, the personal information 23 clients provide at unregulated pregnancy centers is often shared with 24 third-party organizations that similarly do not provide health care 25 services. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to ensure that 26 unregulated pregnancy centers may not require, or institute policies EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14276-01-5 A. 10512 2 1 such that it appears to require, that clients provide such information 2 as a condition of service. 3 § 2599-gg. Definition. For purposes of this section, "unregulated 4 pregnancy center" shall mean a facility or entity, the primary purpose 5 of which is to provide determination of pregnancy or pregnancy coun- 6 seling, that does not provide or refer for a full range of comprehensive 7 reproductive sexual care services; provided, however, that "unregulated 8 pregnancy center" shall not include any facility licensed pursuant to 9 article twenty-eight of this chapter or article thirty-one or thirty-two 10 of the mental hygiene law, or any facility whose primary purpose is to 11 facilitate adoption. 12 § 2599-hh. Prohibited intake questions. An unregulated pregnancy 13 center shall not make it a condition of service, or make it reasonably 14 appear to be a condition of service, that a client must disclose any of 15 the following information: 16 1. lists of, or other information regarding, prescription medications 17 the client takes, the client's current or past illnesses, or the 18 client's medical conditions, except as directly relates to a determi- 19 nation of pregnancy; 20 2. information regarding the client's sexual history including, but 21 not limited to, the client's age when they first became sexually active, 22 the client's current sexual activity status, or the sexual identity of 23 the client; 24 3. information regarding the nature of the client's relationship to 25 the potential baby's non-gestational parent, including but not limited 26 to the name or age of the potential baby's non-gestational parent, or 27 whether the client is currently or was previously living with such indi- 28 vidual; 29 4. if the unregulated pregnancy center does not bill health insurance 30 for services, any information regarding the client's insurance status, 31 income, employer, or eligibility for public assistance; or 32 5. if the unregulated pregnancy center does bill health insurance for 33 services, any information relating to the client's insurance status, 34 income, employer, or eligibility for public assistance, except to the 35 extent necessary to execute such billing. 36 § 2599-ii. Enforcement. The attorney general or the district attorney 37 of any county may bring an action in the name of the people of the state 38 to restrain or prevent any violation of this article or any continuance 39 of such violation. 40 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 41 have become a law.